LEXC/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun_Root
adlaw # "day" ;
babaye # "woman" ;
balay # "house" ;
bata # "child" ;
kan-on # "rice" ;
lalaki # "man" ;
libro # "book" ;
mangga # "mango" ;
pamilya # "family" ;
saging # "banana" ;
tawo # "person" ;
tigulang # "elder" ;
tubig # "water" ;

!TODO Create reduplication lexicon for nouns and other
!TODO Nouns derived from verbs or other roots i.e. eskwelahan
